Illinois, session 104th, HB542.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Local Government Debt Reform Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 350/1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 6901)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the Local Government Debt Reform Act.9(Source: P.A. 85-1419.)